District of Columbia statutes.
9-321

Michigan Avenue Viaduct — Use by street railway companies.

No street railway company shall use the viaduct or any approaches thereto authorized by § 9-320 for its tracks until the said company shall have paid to the Collector of Taxes of the District of Columbia a sum equal to one-fourth of the cost of said viaduct and approaches, which sum shall be deposited to the credit of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 3, 1927, 44 Stat. 1352, ch. 305, § 2
1981 Ed., § 7-521.
1973 Ed., § 7-521.
Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 9-310.